Utah statutes.
67-5b-103.   Appropriation and funding.

(1)  Funding for centers under this section is intended to be broad-based, provided by a line item appropriation by the Legislature to the attorney general, and is intended to include federal grant money, local government money, and private donations.

(2)  The money appropriated shall be used to contract with each public agency designated to oversee the operation and accountability of a center and to cover administrative costs of coordination of the centers' operations.

